Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1118.07
State purchasing bureau; use reverse
auction; powers and duties.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state
purchasing bureau created by section 81-1118 may use a reverse auction for
the acquisition of goods if the bureau determines that the use of a reverse
auction would be advantageous to the state.

(2) If the bureau conducts
a reverse auction, the bureau shall provide notification of the intent to
use the reverse auction process in the bid solicitation documents and, unless
the solicitation is canceled, an award shall be made to the bidder determined
by the bureau to be the lowest responsible bidder at the close of the bidding
process. The bureau may require bidders to register before the opening date
and time of the reverse auction.

(3) The bureau may contract with a third-party vendor
to conduct a reverse auction pursuant to this section.

(4) The bureau may adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations to implement this section.

(5) For purposes of this
section, reverse auction means a process in which (a) bidders compete to provide
goods in an open and interactive environment, which may include the use of
electronic media, (b) bids are opened and made public immediately, and (c)
bidders are given opportunity to submit revised bids until the bidding process
is complete.

Laws 2009, LB168, § 1.